Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that the state has made groundbreaking investments in state-of-the-art mass transit and intermodal infrastructure. The legislature finds that to maximize the state's return on these investments, land use policies and practices must allow housing development to keep pace with progress being implemented in transportation infrastructure development. The legislature also intends new development to reflect the state's commitment to affordable housing and vibrant, walkable, accessible urban environments that improve health, expand multimodal transportation options, and include varied community facilities, parks, and green spaces that are open to people of all income levels.The legislature recognizes that cities planning under chapter 36.70A RCW require direction and technical assistance to ensure the benefits of state transportation investments are maximized and shared equitably while avoiding unnecessary programmatic and cost burdens to local governments in their comprehensive planning, code enactment, and permit processing workloads. The legislature further recognizes that regulatory flexibility and local control are also important features of optimal planning outcomes.Sec. 2. RCW 36.70A.030 and 2024 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Active transportation" means forms of pedestrian mobility including walking or running, the use of a mobility assistive device such as a wheelchair, bicycling and cycling irrespective of the number of wheels, and the use of small personal devices such as foot scooters or skateboards. Active transportation includes both traditional and electric assist bicycles and other devices. Planning for active transportation must consider and address accommodation pursuant to the Americans with disabilities act and the distinct needs of each form of active transportation.(2) "Active transportation facilities" means facilities provided for the safety and mobility of active transportation users including, but not limited to, trails, as defined in RCW 47.30.005, sidewalks, bike lanes, shared-use paths, and other facilities in the public right-of-way.(3) "Administrative design review" means a development permit process whereby an application is reviewed, approved, or denied by the planning director or the planning director's designee based solely on objective design and development standards without a public predecision hearing, unless such review is otherwise required by state or federal law, or the structure is a designated landmark or historic district established under a local preservation ordinance. A city may utilize public meetings, hearings, or voluntary review boards to consider, recommend, or approve requests for variances from locally established design review standards.(4) "Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use plan.(5) "Affordable housing" means, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, residential housing whose monthly costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed ((thirty))30 percent of the monthly income of a household whose income is:(a) For rental housing, 60 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development; or(b) For owner-occupied housing, 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(6) "Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary, vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed, Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term commercial significance for agricultural production.(7) "City" means any city or town, including a code city.(8) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or "plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this chapter.(9) "Cottage housing" means residential units on a lot with a common open space that either: (a) Is owned in common; or (b) has units owned as condominium units with property owned in common and a minimum of 20 percent of the lot size as open space.(10) "Courtyard apartments" means attached dwelling units arranged on two or three sides of a yard or court.(11) "Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas. "Fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas" does not include such artificial features or constructs as irrigation delivery systems, irrigation infrastructure, irrigation canals, or drainage ditches that lie within the boundaries of and are maintained by a port district or an irrigation district or company.(12) "Department" means the department of commerce.(13) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city, including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative body of the county or city.(14) "Emergency housing" means temporary indoor accommodations for individuals or families who are homeless or at imminent risk of becoming homeless that is intended to address the basic health, food, clothing, and personal hygiene needs of individuals or families. Emergency housing may or may not require occupants to enter into a lease or an occupancy agreement.(15) "Emergency shelter" means a facility that provides a temporary shelter for individuals or families who are currently homeless. Emergency shelter may not require occupants to enter into a lease or an occupancy agreement. Emergency shelter facilities may include day and warming centers that do not provide overnight accommodations.(16) "Environmental justice" means the fair treatment and meaningful involvement of all people regardless of race, color, national origin, or income with respect to development, implementation, and enforcement of environmental laws, regulations, and policies. Environmental justice includes addressing disproportionate environmental and health impacts in all laws, rules, and policies with environmental impacts by prioritizing vulnerable populations and overburdened communities and the equitable distribution of resources and benefits.(17) "Extremely low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below ((thirty))30 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(18) "Forestland" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forestland is primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services conducive to conversion of forestland to other uses.(19) "Freight rail dependent uses" means buildings and other infrastructure that are used in the fabrication, processing, storage, and transport of goods where the use is dependent on and makes use of an adjacent short line railroad. Such facilities are both urban and rural development for purposes of this chapter. "Freight rail dependent uses" does not include buildings and other infrastructure that are used in the fabrication, processing, storage, and transport of coal, liquefied natural gas, or "crude oil" as defined in RCW 90.56.010.(20) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development consistent with public health or safety concerns.(21) "Green infrastructure" means a wide array of natural assets and built structures within an urban growth area boundary, including parks and other areas with protected tree canopy, and management practices at multiple scales that manage wet weather and that maintain and restore natural hydrology by storing, infiltrating, evapotranspiring, and harvesting and using stormwater.(22) "Green space" means an area of land, vegetated by natural features such as grass, trees, or shrubs, within an urban context and less than one acre in size that creates public value through one or more of the following attributes:(a) Is accessible to the public;(b) Promotes physical and mental health of residents;(c) Provides relief from the urban heat island effects;(d) Promotes recreational and aesthetic values;(e) Protects streams or water supply; or(f) Preserves visual quality along highway, road, or street corridors.(23) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.(24) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below ((eighty))80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(25) "Major transit stop" means:(a) A stop on a high capacity transportation system funded or expanded under the provisions of chapter 81.104 RCW, except for any stop that solely serves express bus service or serves express bus service and other bus services not otherwise meeting the definition of major transit stop;(b) Commuter rail stops;(c) Stops on rail or fixed guideway systems; or(d) Stops on bus rapid transit routes, including those stops that are under construction.(26) "Middle housing" means buildings that are compatible in scale, form, and character with single-family houses and contain two or more attached, stacked, or clustered homes including duplexes, triplexes, fourplexes, fiveplexes, sixplexes, townhouses, stacked flats, courtyard apartments, and cottage housing.(27) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.(28) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below 120 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(29) "Overburdened community" means a geographic area where vulnerable populations face combined, multiple environmental harms and health impacts, and includes, but is not limited to, highly impacted communities as defined in RCW 19.405.020.(30) "Per capita vehicle miles traveled" means the number of miles traveled using cars and light trucks in a calendar year divided by the number of residents in Washington. The calculation of this value excludes vehicle miles driven conveying freight.(31) "Permanent supportive housing" is subsidized, leased housing with no limit on length of stay that prioritizes people who need comprehensive support services to retain tenancy and utilizes admissions practices designed to use lower barriers to entry than would be typical for other subsidized or unsubsidized rental housing, especially related to rental history, criminal history, and personal behaviors. Permanent supportive housing is paired with on-site or off-site voluntary services designed to support a person living with a complex and disabling behavioral health or physical health condition who was experiencing homelessness or was at imminent risk of homelessness prior to moving into housing to retain their housing and be a successful tenant in a housing arrangement, improve the resident's health status, and connect the resident of the housing with community-based health care, treatment, or employment services. Permanent supportive housing is subject to all of the rights and responsibilities defined in chapter 59.18 RCW.(32) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and schools.(33) "Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection, and other governmental services.(34) "Recreational land" means land so designated under RCW 36.70A.1701 and that, immediately prior to this designation, was designated as agricultural land of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170. Recreational land must have playing fields and supporting facilities existing before July 1, 2004, for sports played on grass playing fields.(35) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:(a) In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the built environment;(b) That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;(c) That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and communities;(d) That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and wildlife habitat;(e) That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling, low-density development;(f) That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and(g) That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and groundwater and surface water recharge and discharge areas.(36) "Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.(37) "Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include those public services and public facilities historically and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include domestic water systems and fire and police protection services associated with rural development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).(38) "Short line railroad" means those railroad lines designated class II or class III by the United States surface transportation board.(39) "Single-family zones" means those zones where single-family detached housing is the predominant land use.(40) "Stacked flat" means dwelling units in a residential building of no more than three stories on a residential zoned lot in which each floor may be separately rented or owned.(41) "Townhouses" means buildings that contain three or more attached single-family dwelling units that extend from foundation to roof and that have a yard or public way on not less than two sides.(42) "Transportation system" means all infrastructure and services for all forms of transportation within a geographical area, irrespective of the responsible jurisdiction or transportation provider.(43) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.(44) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.(45) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.(46) "Very low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below ((fifty))50 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(47)(a) "Vulnerable populations" means population groups that are more likely to be at higher risk for poor health outcomes in response to environmental harms, due to: (i) Adverse socioeconomic factors, such as unemployment, high housing and transportation costs relative to income, limited access to nutritious food and adequate health care, linguistic isolation, and other factors that negatively affect health outcomes and increase vulnerability to the effects of environmental harms; and (ii) sensitivity factors, such as low birth weight and higher rates of hospitalization.(b) "Vulnerable populations" includes, but is not limited to:(i) Racial or ethnic minorities;(ii) Low-income populations; and(iii) Populations disproportionately impacted by environmental harms.(48) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or saturated by surface water or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to mitigate conversion of wetlands.(49) "Wildland urban interface" means the geographical area where structures and other human development meets or intermingles with wildland vegetative fuels.(50) "Floor area ratio" means a measure of development intensity equal to building square footage divided by the developable property square footage. Developable property excludes public facilities and portions of lots with critical areas and critical area buffers as designated in RCW 36.70A.060, except for critical aquifer recharge areas where a single-family detached house is an allowed use provided that any requirements to maintain aquifer recharge are met.(51) "Rail station area" means all lots fully within an urban growth area that are:(a) Fully or partially within one-half mile walking distance of an entrance to a train station with a stop on a light rail system, a commuter rail stop in a city with a population greater than 15,000, or a stop on a rail trolley operated west of the crest of the Cascade mountains; or(b) Fully or partially within one-quarter mile walking distance of an entrance to a train station with a commuter rail stop in a city with a population no greater than 15,000.(52) "Bus station area" means all lots that are:(a) Fully within an urban growth area; and(b) Fully or partially within one-quarter mile walking distance of a stop on a fixed route bus system that is designated as a bus rapid transit stop in the transit development plan as required in RCW 35.58.2795, for which an environmental determination has been issued as required under chapter 43.21C RCW, and that features fixed transit assets that indicate permanent, high capacity service including, but not limited to, elevated platforms or enhanced stations, off-board fare collection, dedicated lanes, busways, or transit signal priority.(53) "Station area" means a bus station area or a rail station area.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) Cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not enact or enforce any development regulation within a station area that would prohibit the siting of multifamily residential housing on lots where any other residential use is permissible.(2)(a) Cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must allow new residential and mixed-use development within any station area at the transit-oriented development density of:(i) At least 3.5 floor area ratio, on average, within a rail station area; and(ii) At least 2.5 floor area ratio, on average, or at least a 3.0 floor area ratio, on average if a city exempts up to 25 percent of bus station areas, within a bus station area.(A) Cities must adopt regulations that allow for greater building height and increased density in all bus station areas for developments built with all mass timber products.(B) For the purposes of this subsection, "mass timber products" has the same meaning as in RCW 19.27.570.(b) A city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may adopt a modification to a station area designation, but only after consultation with and approval by the department.(c) Cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not enact or enforce any development regulation that imposes:(i) A maximum floor area ratio of less than the transit-oriented development density in this subsection for any residential or mixed-use development within a station area, unless a city has adopted an exemption for the station area under (a)(ii) of this subsection; or(ii) A maximum residential density, measured in residential units per acre or other metric of land area within a station area.(3) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Mixed-use development" means a building subject to a regulation specifying allowable residential proportions within mixed-use areas.(b) "Workforce housing" means rental housing with monthly costs that do not exceed 30 percent of the monthly income of a household whose income is at or below 80 percent of the median household income adjusted for household size, for the county where the household is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(4) Within any station area, any building in which all units are affordable or workforce housing for at least 50 years or are dedicated to permanent supportive housing, an additional 1.5 floor area ratio in excess of the transit-oriented development density required under subsection (2)(a) of this section must be permitted.(5) Any floor area within a building located in a station area that is reserved for residential units in multifamily housing that includes at least three bedrooms must not be counted toward applicable floor area ratio limits. A city may require the residential units to comply with affordability requirements to be eligible for an exclusion from the applicable floor area ratio limits.(6) Cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may by ordinance designate parts of a station area in which to enact or enforce floor area ratios for residential or mixed-use development that are more or less than the applicable transit-oriented development density, if the average maximum floor area ratio of all residential and mixed-use areas within a station area is no less than the applicable transit-oriented development density.(7)(a) Buildings constructed within a station area must maintain for at least 50 years:(i) At least 10 percent of all residential units as affordable housing;(ii) At least 10 percent of all residential units as workforce housing if at least 10 percent of the units are family sized units with more than two bedrooms; or (iii) At least 20 percent of all residential units as workforce housing.(b) A building constructed within a station area is exempt from the affordability requirements in (a) of this subsection if:(i) The building is constructed on a lot in which a density that meets or exceeds the transit-oriented development density in subsection (2) of this section was authorized prior to January 1, 2025;(ii) The building is subject to affordability requirements with a lower income threshold or a greater amount of required affordable housing that were enacted by a city prior to December 31, 2025; or(iii) A city has enacted or expands a mandatory program under RCW 36.70A.540 that requires a minimum amount of affordable housing that must be provided by residential development, either on-site or through an in-lieu payment as allowed by RCW 36.70A.540, in an area where development regulations must comply with this section. Such mandatory program may be enacted, modified, or expanded by a city, and may require an amount of affordable housing and levels of affordability that differs or exceeds the requirements. An optional program established under RCW 36.70A.540 does not meet the requirements of this subsection (7)(b)(iii).(c) For each building that is exempt from the requirements for affordable or workforce housing under (b)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, the city must identify the density and affordability requirements that apply to the building or parcel in its comprehensive planning documents. For each building that is exempt from the requirements for affordable or workforce housing under (b)(iii) of this subsection, the city must identify the density and affordability requirements that apply to the building or parcel in its municipal code.(8) A city must approve an exemption under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(D) for multifamily residential housing within a station area that meets the affordability requirements in subsection (7)(a) of this section and the requirements of chapter 84.14 RCW, unless the city authorizes the 20-year exemption under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(C).(9) A city that has enacted an incentive program prior to January 1, 2025, that requires public benefits, such as school capacity, greater amounts of affordable housing, green space, or green infrastructure, in return for additional development allowances, may continue to require such public benefits if the plan and implementing development regulations requiring those public benefits provides development capacity that is substantially similar to that required in this section.(10)(a) No later than the deadlines established in subsection (15) of this section, cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must act to modify or repeal any existing development regulations applicable in a station area that, alone or in combination, are inconsistent with this section, and may not enact any development regulations applicable in a station area that, alone or in combination with other development regulations, are inconsistent with this section.(b) A city may apply any objective development regulations within a station area that are required for other multifamily residential uses in the same zone, including tree canopy and retention requirements.(c) This subsection (10) does not apply to development regulations that are generally applicable health and safety standards, including building code standards and fire and life safety standards.(11) Nothing in this section requires alteration, displacement, or limitation of industrial or agricultural uses or industrial, manufacturing, or agricultural areas within the urban growth area.(12) Nothing in this section requires a city to issue a building permit if other federal, state, and local requirements for a building permit are not met.(13) Cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may exclude from the requirements in this section any portion of a lot that is designated as a shoreline environment governed by a shoreline master program or as a critical area governed by a critical area ordinance, except for critical aquifer recharge areas where a single-family detached house is an allowed use provided that any requirements to maintain aquifer recharge are met, and any lot that:(a) Is nonconforming with development regulations governing lot dimensions including, but not limited to, standards related to lot width, area, geometry, or street access, unless an applicant demonstrates that the nonconforming lot may be developed in compliance with the development regulations governing lot dimensions by obtaining any modification, deviation, variance, or similar code departure approval allowed under the development regulations;(b) Contains a designated landmark or is located within a historic district established under a local preservation ordinance adopted prior to the effective date of this section;(c) Has been designated as containing urban separators by countywide planning policies as of the effective date of this section;(d) Is an industrial, manufacturing, or agricultural designated lot that either is limited to one dwelling unit per lot or only allows housing for individuals and their families responsible for caretaking, farm work, security, or maintenance; or(e) Is in a tsunami inundation area as mapped by the department of natural resources. (14) For cities subject to a growth target adopted under RCW 36.70A.210 that limits the maximum residential capacity of the jurisdiction, any additional residential capacity required by this section may not be considered an inconsistency with the countywide planning policies, multicounty planning policies, or growth targets adopted under RCW 36.70A.210.(15)(a) Any city that is required to review its comprehensive plan by the deadlines specified in RCW 36.70A.130(5)(a) must comply with the requirements of this section by the earlier of December 31, 2029, or its first implementation progress report due after December 31, 2024 as specified in RCW 36.70A.130(9), and thereafter at each comprehensive plan update or implementation progress report following the completion or funding of any major transit stop that would create a new station area within the jurisdiction.(b) Any city that is required to review its comprehensive plan by the deadlines specified in RCW 36.70A.130(5) (b), (c), or (d) must comply with the requirements of this section no later than six months after its first comprehensive plan update due after December 31, 2024, and thereafter at each comprehensive plan update or implementation progress report following the completion or funding of any major transit stop that would create a new station area within the jurisdiction.(c) A federally recognized Indian tribe may voluntarily choose to participate in the planning process to implement the requirements of this section in accordance with RCW 36.70A.040(8).(16)(a) The department must publish a model transit-oriented development ordinance by June 30, 2027.(b) In any city subject to this section that has not passed ordinances, regulations, or other official controls by the deadlines required under subsection (15) of this section, the model ordinance supersedes, preempts, and invalidates local development regulations until the city takes all actions necessary to implement this section. (17) A city may seek an extension from the transit-oriented development density requirements of this section by applying to the department for an extension in any areas that are at high risk of displacement based on a city's antidisplacement analysis or an antidisplacement map. The department must review the city's analysis and certify a five-year extension from the requirements of this section for areas at high risk of displacement. The city must create an implementation plan that identifies the antidisplacement policies available to residents to mitigate displacement risk. During the extension, the city may delay implementation or enact alternative floor area ratio requirements within any areas at high risk of displacement. The department may recertify an extension for additional five-year periods based on evidence of ongoing displacement risk in the area.(18)(a)(i) The department may approve actions under this subsection (18) for cities that have, by June 30, 2026, adopted a plan and implementing development regulations for a specific station area that are substantially similar to the requirements of this section for that station area. In determining whether a city's adopted plan and development regulations are substantially similar, the department's evaluation may include, but not be limited to, if:(A) The regulations will provide a development capacity and allow the opportunity for creation of affordable housing that is at least equivalent to the amount of development capacity and affordable housing that would be allowed in that station area if the specific provisions of this section were adopted;(B) The jurisdiction offers a way to achieve buildings that exceed 85 feet in height; and(C) No lot within the station area is zoned exclusively for detached single-family residences.(ii) The department must establish by rule any standards or procedures necessary to implement (a) of this subsection.(b) Any local actions approved by the department pursuant to (a) of this subsection are exempt from appeals under this chapter and chapter 43.21C RCW.(c) The department's final decision to approve or reject actions by cities under this subsection (18) may be appealed to the growth management hearings board by filing a petition as provided in RCW 36.70A.290.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:Subject to appropriation, the department must establish and administer a grant program to assist cities in providing:(1) The infrastructure necessary to accommodate development at transit-oriented development densities within station areas, including water, sewer, stormwater, and transportation infrastructure and parks and recreation facilities;(2) Station area planning or other predevelopment costs necessary for implementation of station area plans; and (3) The staffing necessary to implement transit-oriented development requirements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:(1) To encourage transit-oriented development and transit use and resulting substantial environmental benefits, cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not require off-street automobile parking as a condition of permitting residential or mixed-use development within a station area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030, except for off-street automobile parking that is permanently marked for the exclusive use of individuals with disabilities or parking that is permanently marked for the short-term exclusive use of delivery vehicles.(2) If a project permit application within a station area, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, does not provide parking in compliance with this section, the proposed absence of parking may not be treated as a basis for issuance of a determination of significance pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW.(3) The parking provisions of this section do not apply:(a) If a local government submits to the department an empirical study prepared by a credentialed transportation or land use planning expert that clearly demonstrates, and the department finds and certifies, that the application of the parking limitations under subsection (1) of this section will be significantly less safe for automobile drivers or passengers, pedestrians, or bicyclists than if the jurisdiction's parking requirements were applied to the same location. The department must develop guidance to assist cities and counties on items to include in the study; or(b) To portions of cities within a one-mile radius of a commercial airport in Washington with at least 9,000,000 annual enplanements.(4) If a residential or mixed-use development provides parking for residential uses in excess of what is required in subsection (1) of this section, cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may enact or enforce development regulations to:(a) Require a share of any provided residential parking to be distributed between units designated as affordable housing and units offered at market rate; and(b) Include all or a portion of the cost of unbundled parking charges into the monthly cost for rental units designated as affordable housing.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 47.12 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department must review surplus property under this chapter in a county with a population over 2,000,000 that operates a municipal transit system and, in consultation with the county, select up to three park and ride facilities to conduct a pilot program to encourage transit-oriented development that meets the density and affordability requirements under section 3 of this act.(2) A park and ride selected for the pilot program must be:(a) Situated along state route number 99 with 400 to 500 parking stalls;(b) Situated on Interstate 405 with 500 to 900 parking stalls; or(c) Located in the southern portion of a county with a population over 2,000,000 with between 300 to 1,000 parking stalls.(3) For the purpose of the pilot program under this section, the department:(a) May release any covenant imposed for highway purposes and replace it with a covenant requiring affordable housing;(b) May not seek a reversionary interest in the property but may enact other remedies enforceable by law.Sec. 7. RCW 43.21C.229 and 2023 c 368 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The purpose of this section is to accommodate infill and housing development and thereby realize the goals and policies of comprehensive plans adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW.(2) A city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is authorized by this section to establish categorical exemptions from the requirements of this chapter. An exemption may be adopted by a city or county under this subsection if it meets the following criteria:(a) It categorically exempts government action related to development proposed to fill in an urban growth area, designated according to RCW 36.70A.110, where current density and intensity of use in the area is roughly equal to or lower than called for in the goals and policies of the applicable comprehensive plan and the development is either:(i) Residential development;(ii) Mixed-use development; or(iii) Commercial development up to 65,000 square feet, excluding retail development;(b) It does not exempt government action related to development that is inconsistent with the applicable comprehensive plan or would clearly exceed the density or intensity of use called for in the goals and policies of the applicable comprehensive plan;(c) The local government considers the specific probable adverse environmental impacts of the proposed action and determines that these specific impacts are adequately addressed by the development regulations or other applicable requirements of the comprehensive plan, subarea plan element of the comprehensive plan, planned action ordinance, or other local, state, or federal rules or laws; and(d)(i) The city or county's applicable comprehensive plan was previously subjected to environmental analysis through an environmental impact statement under the requirements of this chapter prior to adoption; or(ii) The city or county has prepared an environmental impact statement that considers the proposed use or density and intensity of use in the area proposed for an exemption under this section.(3) All project actions that propose to develop one or more residential housing units within the incorporated areas in an urban growth area designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110 or middle housing within the unincorporated areas in an urban growth area designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110, and that meet the criteria identified in (a) and (b) of this subsection, are categorically exempt from the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this section, "middle housing" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70A.030 as amended by chapter 332, Laws of 2023. Jurisdictions shall satisfy the following criteria prior to the adoption of the categorical exemption under this subsection (3):(a) The city or county shall find that the proposed development is consistent with all development regulations implementing an applicable comprehensive plan adopted according to chapter 36.70A RCW by the jurisdiction in which the development is proposed, with the exception of any development regulation that is inconsistent with applicable provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW; and(b) The city or county has prepared environmental analysis that considers the proposed use or density and intensity of use in the area proposed for an exemption under this section and analyzes multimodal transportation impacts, including impacts to neighboring jurisdictions, transit facilities, and the state transportation system.(i) Such environmental analysis shall include documentation that the requirements for environmental analysis, protection, and mitigation for impacts to elements of the environment have been adequately addressed for the development exempted. The requirements may be addressed in locally adopted comprehensive plans, subarea plans, adopted development regulations, other applicable local ordinances and regulations, or applicable state and federal regulations. The city or county must document its consultation with the department of transportation on impacts to state-owned transportation facilities including consideration of whether mitigation is necessary for impacts to transportation facilities.(ii) Before finalizing the environmental analysis pursuant to (b)(i) of this subsection (3), the city or county shall provide a minimum of 60 days' notice to affected tribes, relevant state agencies, other jurisdictions that may be impacted, and the public. If a city or county identifies that mitigation measures are necessary to address specific probable adverse impacts, the city or county must address those impacts by requiring mitigation identified in the environmental analysis pursuant to this subsection (3)(b) through locally adopted comprehensive plans, subarea plans, development regulations, or other applicable local ordinances and regulations. Mitigation measures shall be detailed in an associated environmental determination.(iii) The categorical exemption is effective 30 days following action by a city or county pursuant to (b)(ii) of this subsection (3).(4) Until September 30, 2025, all project actions that propose to develop one or more residential housing or middle housing units within a city west of the crest of the Cascade mountains with a population of 700,000 or more are categorically exempt from the requirements of this chapter. After September 30, 2025, project actions that propose to develop one or more residential housing or middle housing units within the city may utilize the categorical exemption in subsection (3) of this section.(5) All project actions that propose to develop residential or mixed-use development within a station area are categorically exempt from the requirements of this chapter, subject to the rules of the department adopted according to RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) that provide exceptions to the use of categorical exemptions adopted by the department. For the purpose of this subsection:(a) "Mixed-use development" has the same meaning as provided in section 3 of this act; and(b) "Station area" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 36.70A.030.(6) Any categorical exemption adopted by a city or county under this section applies even if it differs from the categorical exemptions adopted by rule of the department under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a). Nothing in this section shall invalidate categorical exemptions or environmental review procedures adopted by a city or county under a planned action pursuant to RCW 43.21C.440. However, any categorical exemption adopted by a city or county under this section shall be subject to the rules of the department adopted according to RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) that provide exceptions to the use of categorical exemptions adopted by the department.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 64.38 RCW to read as follows:(1) Governing documents created after the effective date of this section and applicable to associations located fully or partially within a station area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 may not prohibit the construction or development of multifamily housing or transit-oriented development density that must be permitted by cities under section 3 of this act or require off-street parking inconsistent or in conflict with section 5 of this act.(2) This section expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 64.90 RCW to read as follows:Declarations and governing documents created after the effective date of this section and applicable to a common interest community located fully or partially within a station area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 may not prohibit the construction or development of multifamily housing or transit-oriented development density that must be permitted by cities under section 3 of this act or require off-street parking inconsistent or in conflict with section 5 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 64.34 RCW to read as follows:(1) A declaration created after the effective date of this section and applicable to an association located fully or partially within a station area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 may not prohibit the construction or development of multifamily housing or transit-oriented development density that must be permitted by cities under section 3 of this act or require off-street parking inconsistent or in conflict with section 5 of this act.(2) This section expires January 1, 2028.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 64.32 RCW to read as follows:(1) A declaration created after the effective date of this section and applicable to an association of apartment owners located fully or partially within a station area as defined in RCW 36.70A.030 may not prohibit the construction or development of multifamily housing or transit-oriented development density that must be permitted by cities under section 3 of this act or require off-street parking inconsistent or in conflict with section 5 of this act.(2) This section expires January 1, 2028.Sec. 12. RCW 84.14.010 and 2024 c 332 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the household's monthly income. For the purposes of housing intended for owner occupancy, "affordable housing" means residential housing that is within the means of low or moderate-income households.(2) "Campus facilities master plan" means the area that is defined by the University of Washington as necessary for the future growth and development of its campus facilities for campuses authorized under RCW 28B.45.020.(3) "City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at least fifteen thousand, (b) the largest city or town, if there is no city or town with a population of at least fifteen thousand, located in a county planning under the growth management act, (c) a city or town with a population of at least five thousand located in a county subject to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.215, ((or)) (d) any city that otherwise does not meet the qualifications under (a) through (c) of this subsection, until December 31, 2031, that complies with RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(iii) or 84.14.021(1)(b), or (e) for the exemption authorized in RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(D), a city or town with a station area.(4) "Conversion" means the conversion of a nonresidential building, in whole or in part, to multiple-unit housing under this chapter.(5) "County" means a county with an unincorporated population of at least 170,000.(6) "Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of a city or a county having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may be applied for under this chapter.(7) "Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.(8) "Household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together.(9) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is at or below eighty percent of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the county, city, or metropolitan statistical area, where the project is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(10) "Moderate-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is more than eighty percent but is at or below one hundred fifteen percent of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the county, city, or metropolitan statistical area, where the project is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.(11) "Multiple-unit housing" means a building or a group of buildings having four or more dwelling units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not including hotels and motels. Multifamily units may result from new construction or rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized, or substandard buildings to multifamily housing.(12) "Owner" means the property owner of record.(13) "Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis. This includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for a period of at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.(14) "Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made to achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building codes or modification to existing occupied structures which increase the number of multifamily housing units.(15) "Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing authority as a residential targeted area in accordance with this chapter. With respect to designations after July 1, 2007, "residential targeted area" may not include a campus facilities master plan.(16) "Rural county" means a county with a population between fifty thousand and seventy-one thousand and bordering Puget Sound.(17) "Station area" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.(18) "Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building or housing code requirements that are typically required for rehabilitation as opposed to new construction.(((18)))(19) "Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where urban residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An urban center must contain:(a) Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments that may include but are not limited to shops, offices, banks, restaurants, governmental agencies;(b) Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks, lighting, transit, domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing, recreation, and cultural activities in association with either commercial or office, or both, use.Sec. 13. RCW 84.14.020 and 2021 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The value of new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements qualifying under this chapter is exempt from ad valorem property taxation, as follows:(i) For properties for which applications for certificates of tax exemption eligibility are submitted under this chapter before July 22, 2007, the value is exempt for ten successive years beginning January 1 of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate;(ii) For properties for which applications for certificates of tax exemption eligibility are submitted under this chapter on or after July 22, 2007, the value is exempt:(A) For eight successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate;(B) For twelve successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B). For the property to qualify for the twelve-year exemption under this subsection, the applicant must commit to renting or selling at least twenty percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units to low and moderate-income households, and the property must satisfy that commitment and any additional affordability and income eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this chapter. In the case of projects intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum requirement of this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) may be satisfied solely through housing affordable to moderate-income households; ((or))(C) For 20 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C). For the property to qualify for the 20-year exemption under this subsection, the project must be located within one mile of high capacity transit of at least 15 minute scheduled frequency, in a city that has implemented, as of July 25, 2021, a mandatory inclusionary zoning requirement for affordable housing that ensures affordability of housing units for a period of at least 99 years and that has a population of no more than 65,000 as measured on July 25, 2021. To qualify for the exemption provided in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C), the applicant must commit to renting at least 20 percent of the dwelling units as affordable to low-income households for a term of at least 99 years, and the property must satisfy that commitment and all required affordability and income eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this chapter. A city must require the applicant to record a covenant or deed restriction that ensures the continuing rental of units subject to these affordability requirements consistent with the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C) for a period of no less than 99 years. The covenant or deed restriction must also address criteria and policies to maintain public benefit if the property is converted to a use other than which continues to provide for permanently affordable low-income housing consistent with this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C); or(D) For 20 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property is located fully or partially with a station area of a city and meets the affordability requirements in section 3(7)(a) of this act. A county may approve an exemption under this subsection for multifamily residential housing within a station area if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the density requirements in section 3(2)(a) of this act and affordability requirements in section 3(7)(a) of this act. A city or county must require the applicant to record a covenant or deed restriction that ensures the continuing rental or ownership of units subject to the affordability requirements in section 3(7)(a) of this act for a period of no less than 50 years. The covenant or deed restriction must also address criteria and policies to maintain public benefit if the property is converted to a use other than one which continues to provide for permanently affordable low-income housing consistent with section 3(7)(a) of this act; and(iii) Until December 31, 2026, for a city as defined in RCW 84.14.010(3)(d), for 12 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(iii). For the property to qualify for the 12-year exemption under this subsection, the applicant must commit to renting or selling at least 20 percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units to low and moderate-income households, the property must satisfy that commitment and any additional affordability and income eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this chapter, and the area must be zoned to have an average minimum density equivalent to 15 dwelling units or more per gross acre, or for cities with a population over 20,000, the area must be zoned to have an average minimum density equivalent to 25 dwelling units or more per gross acre. In the case of projects intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum requirement of this subsection (1)(a)(iii) may be satisfied solely through housing affordable to low-income or moderate-income households.(b) The exemptions provided in (a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection do not include the value of land or nonhousing-related improvements not qualifying under this chapter.(c) For properties receiving an exemption as provided in (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection that are in compliance with existing contracts and where the certificate of tax exemption is set to expire after June 11, 2020, but before December 31, 2021, the exemption is extended until December 31, 2021, provided that the property must satisfy any eligibility criteria or limitations provided in this chapter as a condition to the existing exemption for a given property continue to be met. For all properties eligible to receive an extension pursuant to this subsection (1)(c), the city or county that issued the initial certificate of tax exemption, as required in RCW 84.14.090, must notify the county assessor and the applicant of the extension of the certificate of tax exemption.(2) When a local government adopts guidelines pursuant to RCW 84.14.030(2) and includes conditions that must be satisfied with respect to individual dwelling units, rather than with respect to the multiple-unit housing as a whole or some minimum portion thereof, the exemption may, at the local government's discretion, be limited to the value of the qualifying improvements allocable to those dwelling units that meet the local guidelines.(3) In the case of rehabilitation of existing buildings, the exemption does not include the value of improvements constructed prior to the submission of the application required under this chapter. The incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to any other incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by law.(4) This chapter does not apply to increases in assessed valuation made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of building and value of land nor to increases made by lawful order of a county board of equalization, the department of revenue, or a county, to a class of property throughout the county or specific area of the county to achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.(5) At the conclusion of the exemption period, the value of the new housing construction, conversion, or rehabilitation improvements must be considered as new construction for the purposes of chapters 84.55 and 36.21 RCW as though the property was not exempt under this chapter.(6) For properties that qualified for, satisfied the conditions of, and utilized the exemption under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A) or (B) of this section, following the initial exemption period or the extension period authorized in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the exemption period may be extended for an additional 12 years for projects that are within 18 months of expiration contingent on city or county approval. For the property to qualify for an extension under this subsection (6), the applicant must meet at a minimum the locally adopted requirements for the property to qualify for an exemption under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) of this section as applicable at the time of the extension application, and the applicant commits to renting or selling at least 20 percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units for low-income households.(7) At the end of both the tenth and eleventh years of an extension, for twelve-year extensions of the exemption, applicants must provide tenants of rent-restricted units with notification of intent to provide the tenant with rental relocation assistance as provided in subsection (8) of this section.(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for any 12-year exemption authorized under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii) of this section after July 25, 2021, or for any 12-year exemption extension authorized under subsection (6) of this section, at the expiration of the exemption the applicant must provide tenant relocation assistance in an amount equal to one month's rent to a qualified tenant within the final month of the qualified tenant's lease. To be eligible for tenant relocation assistance under this subsection, the tenant must occupy an income-restricted unit at the time the exemption expires and must qualify as a low-income household under this chapter at the time relocation assistance is sought.(b) If affordability requirements consistent, at a minimum, with those required under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii) of this section remain in place for the unit after the expiration of the exemption, relocation assistance in an amount equal to one month's rent must be provided to a qualified tenant within the final month of a qualified tenant's lease who occupies an income-restricted unit at the time those additional affordability requirements cease to apply to the unit.(9) No new exemptions may be provided under this section beginning on or after January 1, 2032. No extensions may be granted under subsection (6) of this section on or after January 1, 2046.Sec. 14. RCW 84.14.030 and 2021 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:An owner of property making application under this chapter must meet the following requirements:(1) The new or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must be ((located)):(a) Located in a residential targeted area as designated by the city or county; or(b) Be located fully or partially within a station area if applying under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(D);(2) The multiple-unit housing must meet guidelines as adopted by the governing authority that may include height, density, public benefit features, number and size of proposed development, parking, income limits for occupancy, limits on rents or sale prices, and other adopted requirements indicated necessary by the city or county. The required amenities should be relative to the size of the project and tax benefit to be obtained;(3) The new, converted, or rehabilitated multiple-unit housing must provide for a minimum of fifty percent of the space for permanent residential occupancy. In the case of existing occupied multifamily development, the multifamily housing must also provide for a minimum of four additional multifamily units. Existing multifamily vacant housing that has been vacant for twelve months or more does not have to provide additional multifamily units;(4) New construction multifamily housing and rehabilitation improvements must be completed within three years from the date of approval of the application, plus any extension authorized under RCW 84.14.090(5);(5) Property proposed to be rehabilitated must fail to comply with one or more standards of the applicable state or local building or housing codes on or after July 23, 1995. If the property proposed to be rehabilitated is not vacant, an applicant must provide each existing tenant housing of comparable size, quality, and price and a reasonable opportunity to relocate; and(6) The applicant must enter into a contract with the city or county approved by the governing authority, or an administrative official or commission authorized by the governing authority, under which the applicant has agreed to the implementation of the development on terms and conditions satisfactory to the governing authority.Sec. 15. RCW 84.14.060 and 2014 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The duly authorized administrative official or committee of the city or county may approve the application if it finds that:(a) A minimum of four new units are being constructed or in the case of occupied rehabilitation or conversion a minimum of four additional multifamily units are being developed;(b) If applicable, the proposed multiunit housing project meets the affordable housing requirements as described in ((RCW 84.14.020))this chapter;(c) The proposed project is or will be, at the time of completion, in conformance with all local plans and regulations that apply at the time the application is approved;(d) The owner has complied with all standards and guidelines adopted by the city or county under this chapter and, if applicable, section 3 of this act; and(e) The site is located in a residential targeted area of an urban center or urban growth area that has been designated by the governing authority in accordance with procedures and guidelines indicated in RCW 84.14.040, or is located fully or partially within a station area if applying under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(D).(2) An application may not be approved after July 1, 2007, if any part of the proposed project site is within a campus facilities master plan, except as provided in RCW 84.14.040(1)(d).(3) An application may not be approved for a residential targeted area in a rural county on or after January 1, 2020.Sec. 16. RCW 84.14.090 and 2021 c 187 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Upon completion of rehabilitation or new construction for which an application for a limited tax exemption under this chapter has been approved and after issuance of the certificate of occupancy, the owner must file with the city or county the following:(a) A statement of the amount of rehabilitation or construction expenditures made with respect to each housing unit and the composite expenditures made in the rehabilitation or construction of the entire property;(b) A description of the work that has been completed and a statement that the rehabilitation improvements or new construction on the owner's property qualify the property for limited exemption under this chapter;(c) If applicable, a statement that the project meets the affordable housing requirements as described in ((RCW 84.14.020))this chapter; and(d) A statement that the work has been completed within three years of the issuance of the conditional certificate of tax exemption.(2) Within ((thirty))30 days after receipt of the statements required under subsection (1) of this section, the authorized representative of the city or county must determine whether the work completed, and the affordability of the units, is consistent with the application and the contract approved by the city or county and is qualified for a limited tax exemption under this chapter. The city or county must also determine which specific improvements completed meet the requirements and required findings.(3) If the rehabilitation, conversion, or construction is completed within three years of the date the application for a limited tax exemption is filed under this chapter, or within an authorized extension of this time limit, and the authorized representative of the city or county determines that improvements were constructed consistent with the application and other applicable requirements, including if applicable, affordable housing requirements, and the owner's property is qualified for a limited tax exemption under this chapter, the city or county must file the certificate of tax exemption with the county assessor within ((ten))10 days of the expiration of the ((thirty))30-day period provided under subsection (2) of this section.(4) The authorized representative of the city or county must notify the applicant that a certificate of tax exemption is not going to be filed if the authorized representative determines that:(a) The rehabilitation or new construction was not completed within three years of the application date, or within any authorized extension of the time limit;(b) The improvements were not constructed consistent with the application or other applicable requirements;(c) If applicable, the affordable housing requirements as described in ((RCW 84.14.020))this chapter were not met; or(d) The owner's property is otherwise not qualified for limited exemption under this chapter.(5) If the authorized representative of the city or county finds that construction or rehabilitation of multiple-unit housing was not completed within the required time period due to circumstances beyond the control of the owner and that the owner has been acting and could reasonably be expected to act in good faith and with due diligence, the governing authority or the city or county official authorized by the governing authority may extend the deadline for completion of construction or rehabilitation for a period not to exceed ((twenty-four))24 consecutive months. For preliminary or final applications submitted on or before February 15, 2020, with any outstanding application requirements, such as obtaining a temporary certificate of occupancy, the city or county may choose to extend the deadline for completion for an additional five years. The five-year extension begins immediately following the completion of any outstanding applications or previously authorized extensions, whichever is later.(6) The governing authority may provide by ordinance for an appeal of a decision by the deciding officer or authority that an owner is not entitled to a certificate of tax exemption to the governing authority, a hearing examiner, or other city or county officer authorized by the governing authority to hear the appeal in accordance with such reasonable procedures and time periods as provided by ordinance of the governing authority. The owner may appeal a decision by the deciding officer or authority that is not subject to local appeal or a decision by the local appeal authority that the owner is not entitled to a certificate of tax exemption in superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, if the appeal is filed within ((thirty))30 days of notification by the city or county to the owner of the decision being challenged.Sec. 17. RCW 84.14.100 and 2021 c 187 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Thirty days after the anniversary of the date of the certificate of tax exemption and each year for the tax exemption period, the owner of the rehabilitated or newly constructed property, or the qualified nonprofit or local government that will assure permanent affordable homeownership for at least 25 percent of the units for properties receiving an exemption under RCW 84.14.021, must file with a designated authorized representative of the city or county an annual report indicating the following:(a) A statement of occupancy and vacancy of the rehabilitated or newly constructed property during the twelve months ending with the anniversary date;(b) A certification by the owner that the property has not changed use and, if applicable, that the property has been in compliance with the affordable housing requirements as described in ((RCW 84.14.020))this chapter since the date of the certificate approved by the city or county;(c) A description of changes or improvements constructed after issuance of the certificate of tax exemption; and(d) Any additional information requested by the city or county in regards to the units receiving a tax exemption.(2) All cities or counties, which issue certificates of tax exemption for multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of this chapter, must report annually by April 1st of each year, beginning in 2007, to the department of commerce. A city or county must be in compliance with the reporting requirements of this section to offer certificates of tax exemption for multiunit housing authorized in this chapter. The report must include the following information:(a) The number of tax exemption certificates granted;(b) The total number and type of units produced or to be produced;(c) The number, size, and type of units produced or to be produced meeting affordable housing requirements;(d) The actual development cost of each unit produced;(e) The total monthly rent or total sale amount of each unit produced;(f) The annual household income and household size for each of the affordable units receiving a tax exemption and a summary of these figures for the city or county; and(g) The value of the tax exemption for each project receiving a tax exemption and the total value of tax exemptions granted.(3)(a) The department of commerce must adopt and implement a program to effectively audit or review that the owner or operator of each property for which a certificate of tax exemption has been issued, except for those properties receiving an exemption that are owned or operated by a nonprofit or for those properties receiving an exemption from a city or county that operates an independent audit or review program, is offering the number of units at rents as committed to in the approved application for an exemption and that the tenants are being properly screened to be qualified for an income-restricted unit. The audit or review program must be adopted in consultation with local governments and other stakeholders and may be based on auditing a percentage of income-restricted units or properties annually. A private owner or operator of a property for which a certificate of tax exemption has been issued under this chapter, must be audited at least once every five years.(b) If the review or audit required under (a) of this subsection for a given property finds that the owner or operator is not offering the number of units at rents as committed to in the approved application or is not properly screening tenants for income-restricted units, the department of commerce must notify the city or county and the city or county must impose and collect a sliding scale penalty not to exceed an amount calculated by subtracting the amount of rents that would have been collected had the owner or operator complied with their commitment from the amount of rents collected by the owner or operator for the income-restricted units, with consideration of the severity of the noncompliance. If a subsequent review or audit required under (a) of this subsection for a given property finds continued substantial noncompliance with the program requirements, the exemption certificate must be canceled pursuant to RCW 84.14.110.(c) The department of commerce may impose and collect a fee, not to exceed the costs of the audit or review, from the owner or operator of any property subject to an audit or review required under (a) of this subsection.(4) The department of commerce must provide guidance to cities and counties, which issue certificates of tax exemption for multiunit housing that conform to the requirements of this chapter, on best practices in managing and reporting for the exemption programs authorized under this chapter, including guidance for cities and counties to collect and report demographic information for tenants of units receiving a tax exemption under this chapter.(5) This section expires January 1, 2058.Sec. 18. RCW 84.14.110 and 2012 c 194 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If improvements have been exempted under this chapter, the improvements continue to be exempted for the applicable period under RCW 84.14.020, so long as they are not converted to another use and continue to satisfy all applicable conditions. If the owner intends to convert the multifamily development to another use, or if applicable, if the owner intends to discontinue compliance with the affordable housing requirements as described in ((RCW 84.14.020))this chapter or any other condition to exemption, the owner must notify the assessor within sixty days of the change in use or intended discontinuance. If, after a certificate of tax exemption has been filed with the county assessor, the authorized representative of the governing authority discovers that a portion of the property is changed or will be changed to a use that is other than residential or that housing or amenities no longer meet the requirements, including, if applicable, affordable housing requirements, as previously approved or agreed upon by contract between the city or county and the owner and that the multifamily housing, or a portion of the housing, no longer qualifies for the exemption, the tax exemption must be canceled and the following must occur:(a) Additional real property tax must be imposed upon the value of the nonqualifying improvements in the amount that would normally be imposed, plus a penalty must be imposed amounting to twenty percent. This additional tax is calculated based upon the difference between the property tax paid and the property tax that would have been paid if it had included the value of the nonqualifying improvements dated back to the date that the improvements were converted to a nonmultifamily use;(b) The tax must include interest upon the amounts of the additional tax at the same statutory rate charged on delinquent property taxes from the dates on which the additional tax could have been paid without penalty if the improvements had been assessed at a value without regard to this chapter; and(c) The additional tax owed together with interest and penalty must become a lien on the land and attach at the time the property or portion of the property is removed from multifamily use or the amenities no longer meet applicable requirements, and has priority to and must be fully paid and satisfied before a recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation, or responsibility to or with which the land may become charged or liable. The lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and in the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real property taxes. An additional tax unpaid on its due date is delinquent. From the date of delinquency until paid, interest must be charged at the same rate applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.(2) Upon a determination that a tax exemption is to be canceled for a reason stated in this section, the governing authority or authorized representative must notify the record owner of the property as shown by the tax rolls by mail, return receipt requested, of the determination to cancel the exemption. The owner may appeal the determination to the governing authority or authorized representative, within thirty days by filing a notice of appeal with the clerk of the governing authority, which notice must specify the factual and legal basis on which the determination of cancellation is alleged to be erroneous. The governing authority or a hearing examiner or other official authorized by the governing authority may hear the appeal. At the hearing, all affected parties may be heard and all competent evidence received. After the hearing, the deciding body or officer must either affirm, modify, or repeal the decision of cancellation of exemption based on the evidence received. An aggrieved party may appeal the decision of the deciding body or officer to the superior court under RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.(3) Upon determination by the governing authority or authorized representative to terminate an exemption, the county officials having possession of the assessment and tax rolls must correct the rolls in the manner provided for omitted property under RCW 84.40.080. The county assessor must make such a valuation of the property and improvements as is necessary to permit the correction of the rolls. The value of the new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements added to the rolls is considered as new construction for the purposes of chapter 84.55 RCW. The owner may appeal the valuation to the county board of equalization under chapter 84.48 RCW and according to the provisions of RCW 84.40.038. If there has been a failure to comply with this chapter, the property must be listed as an omitted assessment for assessment years beginning January 1 of the calendar year in which the noncompliance first occurred, but the listing as an omitted assessment may not be for a period more than three calendar years preceding the year in which the failure to comply was discovered.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 19. A new section is added to chapter 84.14 RCW to read as follows:The governing authority of a city with a station area must adopt and implement standards and guidelines to be used in considering applications and making the determinations required under RCW 84.14.060. The standards and guidelines must establish basic requirements for both new construction and rehabilitation, which must include:(1) Application process and procedures;(2) Income and rent standards for affordable units that meet the requirements of section 3(7)(a) of this act;(3) Requirements that address demolition of existing structures and site utilization; and(4) Building requirements that comply with this act.Sec. 20. RCW 82.02.060 and 2023 c 337 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:The local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:(1) Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of development activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule shall be based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees. The schedule shall reflect the proportionate impact of new housing units, including multifamily and condominium units, based on the square footage, number of bedrooms, or trips generated, in the housing unit in order to produce a proportionally lower impact fee for smaller housing units. In determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:(a) The cost of public facilities necessitated by new development;(b) An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities for past or future payments made or reasonably anticipated to be made by new development to pay for particular system improvements in the form of user fees, debt service payments, taxes, or other payments earmarked for or proratable to the particular system improvement;(c) The availability of other means of funding public facility improvements;(d) The cost of existing public facilities improvements; and(e) The methods by which public facilities improvements were financed;(2) May provide an exemption for low-income housing, and other development activities with broad public purposes, including development of an early learning facility, from these impact fees, provided that the impact fees for such development activity shall be paid from public funds other than impact fee accounts;(3)(a) May not impose an impact fee on development activities of an early learning facility greater than that imposed on commercial retail or commercial office development activities that generate a similar number, volume, type, and duration of vehicle trips;(b) When a facility or development has more than one use, the limitations in this subsection (3) or the exemption applicable to an early learning facility in subsections (2) and (4) of this section only apply to that portion that is developed as an early learning facility. The impact fee assessed on an early learning facility in such a development or facility may not exceed the least of the impact fees assessed on comparable businesses in the facility or development;(4) May provide an exemption from impact fees for low-income housing or for early learning facilities. Local governments that grant exemptions for low-income housing or for early learning facilities under this subsection (4) may either: Grant a partial exemption of not more than ((eighty))80 percent of impact fees, in which case there is no explicit requirement to pay the exempted portion of the fee from public funds other than impact fee accounts; or provide a full waiver, in which case the remaining percentage of the exempted fee must be paid from public funds other than impact fee accounts, except as provided in (b) of this subsection. These exemptions are subject to the following requirements:(a) An exemption for low-income housing granted under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4) must be conditioned upon requiring the developer to record a covenant that, except as provided otherwise by this subsection, prohibits using the property for any purpose other than for low-income housing. At a minimum, the covenant must address price restrictions and household income limits for the low-income housing, and that if the property is converted to a use other than for low-income housing, the property owner must pay the applicable impact fees in effect at the time of conversion;(b) An exemption for early learning facilities granted under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4) may be a full waiver without an explicit requirement to pay the exempted portion of the fee from public funds other than impact fee accounts if the local government requires the developer to record a covenant that requires that at least 25 percent of the children and families using the early learning facility qualify for state subsidized child care, including early childhood education and assistance under chapter 43.216 RCW, and that provides that if the property is converted to a use other than for an early learning facility, the property owner must pay the applicable impact fees in effect at the time of conversion, and that also provides that if at no point during a calendar year does the early learning facility achieve the required percentage of children and families qualified for state subsidized child care using the early learning facility, the property owner must pay 20 percent of the impact fee that would have been imposed on the development had there not been an exemption within 90 days of the local government notifying the property owner of the breach, and any balance remaining thereafter shall be a lien on the property; and(c) Covenants required by (a) and (b) of this subsection must be recorded with the applicable county auditor or recording officer. A local government granting an exemption under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4) for low-income housing or an early learning facility may not collect revenue lost through granting an exemption by increasing impact fees unrelated to the exemption. A school district who receives school impact fees must approve any exemption under subsection (2) of this section or this subsection (4);(5) Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement to, or new construction of any system improvements provided by the developer, to facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the development activity;(6) Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly;(7) Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to be imposed on a particular development that permits consideration of studies and data submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;(8) Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it shall calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit of development;(9) May provide for the imposition of an impact fee for system improvement costs previously incurred by a county, city, or town to the extent that new growth and development will be served by the previously constructed improvements provided such fee shall not be imposed to make up for any system improvement deficiencies; ((and))(10) Shall provide a 50 percent reduction of the impact fees specified in the schedule of impact fees for system improvements under RCW 82.02.090(7)(a) if the project is within a station area and claiming a multiple-unit housing property tax exemption under RCW 84.14.020(1)(a)(ii)(D); and(11) Must adopt or amend by ordinance, and incorporate into their development regulations, zoning regulations, and other official controls the requirements of this section to take effect six months after the jurisdiction's next periodic comprehensive plan update required under RCW 36.70A.130.For purposes of this section, "low-income housing" means housing with a monthly housing expense, that is no greater than ((thirty))30 percent of ((eighty))80 percent of the median family income adjusted for family size, for the county where the project is located, as reported by the United States department of housing and urban development.For the purposes of this section, "early learning facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 43.31.565.Sec. 21. RCW 82.02.090 and 2023 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.080 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Development activity" means any construction or expansion of a building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or structure, or any changes in the use of land, that creates additional demand and need for public facilities. "Development activity" does not include:(a) Buildings or structures constructed by a regional transit authority; or(b) Buildings or structures constructed as shelters that provide emergency housing for people experiencing homelessness, or emergency shelters for victims of domestic violence, as defined in RCW 70.123.020.(2) "Development approval" means any written authorization from a county, city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development activity.(3) "Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development as a condition of development approval to pay for public facilities needed to serve new growth and development, and that is reasonably related to the new development that creates additional demand and need for public facilities, that is a proportionate share of the cost of the public facilities, and that is used for facilities that reasonably benefit the new development. "Impact fee" does not include a reasonable permit or application fee.(4) "Owner" means the owner of record of real property, although when real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the purchaser is considered the owner of the real property if the contract is recorded.(5) "Project improvements" mean site improvements and facilities that are planned and designed to provide service for a particular development project and that are necessary for the use and convenience of the occupants or users of the project, and are not system improvements. An improvement or facility included in a capital facilities plan approved by the governing body of the county, city, or town is not considered a project improvement.(6) "Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of public facility improvements that are reasonably related to the service demands and needs of new development.(7) "Public facilities" means the following capital facilities owned or operated by government entities: (a) Public streets, roads, and bicycle and pedestrian facilities that were designed with multimodal commuting as an intended use; (b) publicly owned parks, open space, and recreation facilities; (c) school facilities; and (d) fire protection facilities.(8) "Service area" means a geographic area defined by a county, city, town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of public facilities provide service to development within the area. Service areas must be designated on the basis of sound planning or engineering principles.(9) "Station area" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 36.70A.030.(10) "System improvements" mean public facilities that are included in the capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to service areas within the community at large, in contrast to project improvements.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 22. Sections 12 through 19 of this act apply to property taxes levied for collection in 2026 and thereafter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 23. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---